Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3222
Board; copy of certain documents; furnish to department.

The board shall furnish to the department copies of its rules, regulations, audits, meeting minutes, and other documents as the department may require in the performance of its duties.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 22, p. 114;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 896, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 436, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 56.